Utah statutes.
31A-14-210.   Requirements for foreign fraternals.

(1) A foreign fraternal may not be authorized to do business in this state under Section 31A-14-203, unless it strictly complies with:

(a)  the financial requirements of Section 31A-9-209 and Chapter 17, Part 6, Risk-Based Capital;

(b)  the requirements of Section 16-6a-1506 and Subsection 31A-5-410(1)(a), the reporting requirements of Subsection 31A-5-410(2), Section 31A-5-413 whenever removal is made involuntarily under the laws of the domicile, Section 31A-9-202, and Subsections 31A-9-204(1)(c), 31A-9-402(2), and 31A-9-602(1); and

(c)  for five years after the initial issuance of a certificate of authority in its domiciliary jurisdiction, the requirements of Subsection 31A-9-213(2).

(2) (a)  No foreign fraternal may be authorized to do business in this state unless it substantially complies with Sections 31A-5-217 and 31A-5-218, except that the approval requirement of Subsection 31A-5-217(2) does not apply.

(b)  When any corporate reorganization, transformation, or liquidation of a foreign fraternal, or any levy to cover a deficiency under a law comparable to Subsection 31A-9-209(2), is formally initiated by the fraternal, by the official act of the domiciliary commissioner, or by any other official, the fraternal shall promptly give written notice to the commissioner.

(3)  The commissioner may issue orders imposing and eliminating restrictions under Section 31A-9-103 that are applicable to foreign fraternals.

(4) (a)  After a hearing, the commissioner may, by order, apply any of the provisions of Sections 31A-9-213, 31A-9-404, 31A-9-411, 31A-9-413, or Subsection 31A-5-415(2) to a foreign fraternal after finding that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of its members, creditors, or the public in this state.

(b)  If any provision made applicable to the foreign fraternal under Subsection (4)(a) conflicts with a provision of the law of the domicile, so that it is impossible for the fraternal to comply with both, the law of the domicile governs.

